apertium-sux.sux.lexd
mu_na_ru_SEP_mu_nn_a<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat>:mu-na-ru
u3_na_a_du11_SEP_u_nn_a_e_dug<vblex><ant><2-sg-a><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat>:u3-na-a-du11
ba_al_e_de3_SEP_<vblex><nf><dat-nh><pf>:ba-al-e-de3
he2_na_szum2_mu_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-a><fin><3-sg-nh-p><mod><3-sg-h><dat>:he2-na-szum2-mu
us2_gar_SEP_<vblex><nf><3-sg-s>:us2-gar
he2_eb_da_an_gi4_gi4_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-a><fin><3-sg-nh-p><mod1>:he2-eb-da-an-gi4-gi4
kal_ga_SEP_kalag<vblex><sub><nf>:kal-ga
limmu2_ba_SEP_limmu<vblex><gen><3-sg-nh-poss><nf><abs>:limmu2-ba
ru_SEP_<vblex>:ru
i3_gal2_SEP_i<vblex><fin><l1><3-sg-s>:i3-gal2
ba_dim2_SEP_ba_dim<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-dim2
ba_usz2_SEP_ba_usz<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-usz2
us2_sa_SEP_us<vblex><nf><pt>:us2-sa
ba_hul_SEP_ba_hulu<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hul
ba_usz2_SEP_ba_ug<vblex><3-pl-s><mid><pl>:ba-usz2
la2_SEP_la<vblex><nf><abs>:la2
ba_ti_SEP_ba<vblex><3-sg-h-a><mid><3-sg-p>:ba-ti
ba_hun_SEP_ba_hug<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hun
ba_hun_ta_SEP_<vblex><abl><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hun-ta
ak_SEP_ak<vblex><nf><pt>:ak
gar_ra_ke4_ne_SEP_<vblex>:gar-ra-ke4-ne
i3_pa3_SEP_i_pad<vblex><fin><3-sg-s>:i3-pa3
ba_du3_SEP_ba_du<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-du3
niga_SEP_niga<vblex><nf><abs>:niga
ba_zi_SEP_ba_zig<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-zi
niga_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><gen><3-sg-nh-poss><nf>:niga-sze3
zi_ga_SEP_zig<vblex><nf><pt>:zi-ga
til_la_SEP_til<vblex><nf><pt>:til-la
saga_SEP_saga<vblex><nf><abs>:saga
du_SEP_gin<vblex><nf><abs>:du
gid2_da_SEP_gid<vblex><nf><pt>:gid2-da
si_ga_SEP_sig<vblex><nf><pt>:si-ga
diri_ga_SEP_dirig<vblex><nf><pt>:diri-ga
ga6_ga2_SEP_gag<vblex><nf><pt>:ga6-ga2
da_mi_ma_ma_sze3_SEP_<vblex>:da-mi-ma-ma-sze3
ba_al_la_SEP_bala<vblex><nf><pt>:ba-al-la
ba_ab_du8_SEP_ba_b_du<vblex><3-sg-nh-l3><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-ab-du8
usz2_SEP_usz<vblex><nf><abs>:usz2
i3_dab5_SEP_i<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-p>:i3-dab5
da_a_da_ga_SEP_<vblex>:da-a-da-ga
nu_SEP_nu<vblex><nf><abs>:nu
zah3_SEP_zah<vblex><nf><pt>:zah3
kar_ra_SEP_<vblex>:kar-ra
gal_la_SEP_<vblex><term><gen><3-sg-nh-poss><nf>:gal-la
tak4_a_SEP_taka<vblex><nf><pt>:tak4-a
gar_su4_da_SEP_<vblex>:gar-su4-da
nu_dab_SEP_<vblex>:nu-dab
be6_dam_SEP_<vblex>:be6-dam
dab_ba_SEP_dab<vblex><nf><pt>:dab-ba
mu_hul_SEP_mu<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-p>:mu-hul
szum2_sikil_SEP_<vblex>:szum2-sikil
duru5_SEP_<vblex>:duru5
had2_SEP_had<vblex><nf><abs>:had2
su_ga_SEP_sug<vblex><nf><pt>:su-ga
dab5_SEP_<vblex>:dab5
na_ba_du3_SEP_nan_ba<vblex><l2><pf><mod><3-sg-s><mid>:na-ba-du3
_us2_sa_SEP_us<vblex><nf><pt>:us2-sa
in_ni_gar_ra_SEP_i_nn_i_n_gar<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><l2><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><sub>:in-ni-gar-ra
i3_me_a_SEP_i_me<vblex><fin><sub><3-sg-s>:i3-me-a
ma_ab_szum2_ma_SEP_mu_a_b_szum<vblex><3-sg-a><ven><3-sg-nh-p><dat><sub>:ma-ab-szum2-ma
bi2_in_du11_SEP_b_i_n_dug<vblex><3-sg-h-a><l3><3-sg-p><3-sg-nh>:bi2-in-du11
ba_ne_tar_ra_SEP_ba_nne_tar<vblex><sub><mid><3-pl-dat><3-sg-s>:ba-ne-tar-ra
nu_u3_zu_SEP_nu_i<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><neg><abs><3-pl><sub>:nu-u3-zu
bi2_in_ne2_sza_sze3_SEP_bi_i_n_e<vblex><3-sg-h-a><gen><pl><l2><3-sg-nh><term><3-pl><sub>:bi2-in-ne2-sza-sze3
ba_na_gi_in_SEP_ba_nn_a_gin<vblex><dat><mid><3-sg-h><3-sg-s>:ba-na-gi-in
tusz_sza_me_SEP_tusz<vblex><nf><cop-3-pl><abs><pt>:tusz-sza-me
us2_SEP_us<vblex><nf><abs>:us2
du3_a_SEP_du<vblex><nf><pt>:du3-a
hi_a_SEP_hi<vblex><nf><pt>:hi-a
tag_tag_ga_SEP_<vblex><rdp><nf><pt>:tag-tag-ga
ki_ag2_ga2_ni_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-poss><nf><abs>:ki-ag2-ga2-ni
mu_du3_SEP_mu<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-p>:mu-du3
gub_ba_SEP_gub<vblex><nf><pt>:gub-ba
a_de2_SEP_<vblex>:a-de2
in_dim2_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat>:in-dim2
ge6_SEP_giggi<vblex><nf><abs>:ge6
ba_an_kux_KWU147_SEP_<vblex><mid><l1-syn><3-sg-s>:ba-an-kux\(KWU147\)
gurx_SZE_KIN_SEP_<vblex><gen><nf><pt>:gurx\(\|SZE.KIN\|\)
in_zu_a_SEP_<vblex>:in-zu-a
mu_ne_dim2_SEP_mu_nnee<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-p><dat><3-pl>:mu-ne-dim2
limmu2_ba_ke4_SEP_<vblex><erg><gen><3-sg-nh-poss><nf>:limmu2-ba-ke4
in_na_ba_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat>:in-na-ba
in_na_szum2_ma_SEP_i_nn_a<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><l1><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat><sub>:in-na-szum2-ma
de2_a_SEP_de<vblex><nf><pt>:de2-a
mah_SEP_mah<vblex><nf>:mah
mu_ne_du3_SEP_mu_nnee<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-p><dat><3-pl>:mu-ne-du3
ba_ti_esz2_SEP_ba<vblex><3-sg-h-a><mid><3-pl>:ba-ti-esz2
zal_la_SEP_zal<vblex><nf><pt>:zal-la
lu2_SEP_zah<vblex><nf><pt>:lu2
zah3_SEP_<vblex>:zah3
dab5_de3_SEP_gen<vblex><nf><pt>:dab5-de3
didli_SEP_didli<vblex><nf><abs>:didli
de6_a_SEP_de<vblex><nf><pt>:de6-a
ib2_dab5_SEP_<vblex>:ib2-dab5
mu_dim2_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-p>:mu-dim2
kux_KWU636_ra_SEP_<vblex><nf><pt>:kux\(KWU636\)-ra
dam_gar3_ne_SEP_<vblex>:dam-gar3-ne
in_du3_a_SEP_i_n_du<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><abs><3-sg-p><sub>:in-du3-a
gibil_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><nf><abs>:gibil-sze3
he2_na_ab_szum2_mu_SEP_ha_i_nn_a_b_szum<vblex><3-sg-a><fin><3-sg-nh-p><mod><3-sg-h><dat>:he2-na-ab-szum2-mu
na_mi_gur_re_SEP_nan_m<vblex><3-sg-a><ven><l2><3-sg-nh><3-sg-nh-p><mod>:na-mi-gur-re
nu_na_an_szum2_SEP_<vblex>:nu-na-an-szum2
ku4_ra_SEP_kur<vblex><nf><pt>:ku4-ra
ba_du3_sze3_SEP_<vblex>:ba-du3-sze3
gi4_gi4_SEP_<vblex>:gi4-gi4
ba_ab_rex_HU_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><mid><3-pl>:ba-ab-rex\(HU\)
nu_na_be2_ne_a_SEP_<vblex><sub><nf>:nu-na-be2-ne-a
i3_pa3_de3_esz2_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-pl>:i3-pa3-de3-esz2
siki_ba_SEP_<vblex>:siki-ba
nu_tuku_SEP_nu_tuku<vblex><neg><nf><pt>:nu-tuku
su_su_dam_SEP_sug_sug<vblex><f><cop-3-sg><abs><nf><rdp>:su-su-dam
ba_zal_SEP_ba_zal<vblex><mid><sub><3-sg-s>:ba-zal
us2_a_SEP_us<vblex><nf><pt>:us2-a
in_la2_SEP_i_n_la<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-p>:in-la2
us2_sa_bi_SEP_us<vblex><3-sg-nh-poss><nf><pt>:us2-sa-bi
kux_KWU147_kux_KWU147_SEP_<vblex><nf><pt>:kux\(KWU147\)-kux\(KWU147\)
didli_bi_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-nh-poss><nf><abs>:didli-bi
gen_na_SEP_gen<vblex><nf><pt>:gen-na
zi_ga_am3_SEP_zig<vblex><nf><cop-3-sg><abs><pt>:zi-ga-am3
hun_ga2_SEP_hug<vblex><nf><pt>:hun-ga2
tusz_a_SEP_tusz<vblex><nf><pt>:tusz-a
ba_BAD_SEP_<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-BAD
gub_SEP_<vblex><nf><pt>:gub
nu_ti_SEP_<vblex><num><cop-3-sg><ed><nf>:nu-ti
nu_ti_a_SEP_<vblex>:nu-ti-a
nu_ti_a_SEP_<vblex>:nu-ti-a
gala_SEP_<vblex><gen><3-sg-nh-poss><nf>:gala
nu_e3_SEP_nu_e<vblex><neg><nf><f>:nu-e3
sur_ra_SEP_<vblex><gen><abl><abs><nf><rdp>:sur-ra
uru4_a_SEP_uru<vblex><nf><pt>:uru4-a
du8_a_SEP_du<vblex><pt><nf><abs>:du8-a
gul_la_SEP_<vblex>:gul-la
tu_ra_SEP_tur<vblex><nf><pt>:tu-ra
mu_na_du3_SEP_mu_nn_a<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat>:mu-na-du3
mu_na_ba_al_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat>:mu-na-ba-al
ba_gen_na_a_SEP_ba_gen<vblex><l1><mid><sub><3-sg-s>:ba-gen-na-a
dab5_ba_de3_SEP_dab<vblex><nf><dat-nh><f>:dab5-ba-de3
im_gen_na_a_SEP_i_m_gen<vblex><fin><l1><ven><3-sg-s><sub>:im-gen-na-a
im_ta_SEP_<vblex>:im-ta
in_na_la2_e_SEP_<vblex><fin><l1><3-sg-s><3-sg-h><dat><sub>:in-na-la2-e
ba_ra_zal_SEP_<vblex><mid><sub><3-sg-s>:ba-ra-zal
gub_ba_me_SEP_<vblex><gen><nf><pt>:gub-ba-me
kab2_du11_ga_SEP_kabdug<vblex><nf><pt>:kab2-du11-ga
ba_a_hun_SEP_ba_hug<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-a-hun
dara4_SEP_<vblex>:dara4
gal_SEP_gal<vblex><nf><abs>:gal
ag2_e_dam_SEP_ag<vblex><nf><cop-3-sg><abs><f>:ag2-e-dam
dab5_ba_ke4_ne_SEP_<vblex><f><nf><abs>:dab5-ba-ke4-ne
ga2_ra_SEP_<vblex>:ga2-ra
kar2_kar2_SEP_<vblex>:kar2-kar2
tar_re_SEP_tar<vblex><nf><f>:tar-re
la2_a_SEP_la<vblex><nf><pt>:la2-a
ba_zal_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-zal-sze3
ba_usz2_bi_SEP_<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-usz2-bi
i3_sa2_SEP_<vblex>:i3-sa2
ga2_ga2_SEP_gar_gar<vblex><rdp><pf><nf><f>:ga2-ga2
du_SEP_du<vblex><nf><abs>:du
gur4_ra_SEP_<vblex>:gur4-ra
mu2_a_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><gen><ven><3-sg-h-poss><3-sg-p><sub>:mu2-a
ri_ri_ga_SEP_deg<vblex><nf><pt>:ri-ri-ga
dabx_U8_ba_SEP_dab<vblex><nf><pt>:dabx\(U8\)-ba
_ga2_SEP_<vblex>:-ga2
il2_la_SEP_<vblex>:il2-la
us2_sa_a_bi_SEP_us<vblex><3-sg-nh-poss><nf><pt>:us2-sa-a-bi
ba_al_SEP_<vblex><nf><pt>:ba-al
szu_du7_a_SEP_szudu<vblex><pt><nf><abs>:szu-du7-a
ba_du3_a_SEP_ba_du<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-du3-a
zi_zi_SEP_<vblex><pt><neg><abs><nf><rdp>:zi-zi
ba_hun_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hun-sze3
mu_ne_dim2_sze3_SEP_mu_nnee<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><3-pl><3-sg-p><term><dat>:mu-ne-dim2-sze3
ba_a_SEP_ba<vblex><nf><pt>:ba-a
silim_ma_SEP_silim<vblex><nf><pt>:silim-ma
gur10_a_SEP_gur<vblex><nf><pt>:gur10-a
tab_ba_SEP_tab<vblex><nf><pt>:tab-ba
asz_a_SEP_<vblex><l1><nf>:asz-a
dun_a_SEP_<vblex>:dun-a
sanga_ne_SEP_<vblex>:sanga-ne
_e_ne_SEP_<vblex>:...-e-ne
gal2_la_SEP_gal<vblex><nf><pt>:gal2-la
_ga2_gar_SEP_gar<vblex><nf><pt>:\{ga2\}gar
i3_pa3_ta_SEP_<vblex>:i3-pa3-ta
ba_hul_sze3_SEP_ba_hulu<vblex><term><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hul-sze3
min_a_bi_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-nh-poss><sub><nf>:min-a-bi
ku5_ra2_SEP_kud<vblex><nf><pt>:ku5-ra2
e3_ta_SEP_<vblex><gen><abl><nf><pt>:e3-ta
tam_gu2_gu2_SEP_<vblex>:tam-gu2-gu2
nam_gi4_SEP_<vblex>:nam-gi4
ba_ni_ak_SEP_<vblex><l1><mid><sub><3-sg-s>:ba-ni-ak
i3_du3_SEP_<vblex>:i3-du3
i3_in_de2_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-h><l3><3-pl><sub><l2-nh>:i3-in-de2
ib2_dab6_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><ven><3-nh><3-sg-p><l3>:ib2-dab6
ga_bu_ni_SEP_<vblex>:ga-bu-ni
mu_ub_ze2_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><gen><ven><3-sg-h-poss><3-sg-p><sub>:mu-ub-ze2
um_ma_gi_SEP_<vblex>:um-ma-gi
x_a_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><l1><ven><3-sg-p><sub>:x-a
he2_la2_e_SEP_<vblex>:he2-la2-e
sa6_ga_SEP_<vblex><sub><nf>:sa6-ga
he2_en_sa6_SEP_<vblex><fin><l1-syn><mod1><3-sg-s>:he2-en-sa6
hul_a_SEP_hulu<vblex><nf><pt>:hul-a
i3_nu_SEP_<vblex>:i3-nu
ba_hul_ta_SEP_ba_hulu<vblex><abl><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hul-ta
ba_dim2_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-dim2-sze3
zal_la_ta_SEP_zal<vblex><abl><nf><pt>:zal-la-ta
saga_ta_SEP_saga<vblex><abl><nf><abs>:saga-ta
im_mi_tak4_a_sze3_SEP_<vblex>:im-mi-tak4-a-sze3
ba_an_da_zah3_SEP_<vblex>:ba-an-da-zah3
mu_dab5_SEP_<vblex>:mu-dab5
in_gar_SEP_<vblex><fin><3-sg-h><com><3-sg-s>:in-gar
gesz_gar_ra_SEP_geszgar<vblex><nf><pt>:gesz-gar-ra
ur3_ra_SEP_ur<vblex><nf><pt>:ur3-ra
ba_ab_x_mu_SEP_ba_b_x_mu<vblex><_><3-sg-nh-l3><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-ab-x-mu
su_ba_SEP_sub<vblex><pt><nf><abs>:su-ba
sumun_SEP_sumun<vblex><nf><abs>:sumun
du10_ga_SEP_dug<vblex><nf><pt>:du10-ga
tur_SEP_tur<vblex><nf><abs>:tur
se3_ga_SEP_sig<vblex><nf><pt>:se3-ga
du7_a_SEP_du<vblex><nf><pt>:du7-a
i3_ib2_u3_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-h><l3><3-pl><sub><l2-nh>:i3-ib2-u3
ba_a_si_SEP_<vblex>:ba-a-si
pa3_da_SEP_Pada<vblex><sub><nf>:pa3-da
sag_us2_SEP_<vblex><nf>:sag-us2
ba_du3_ta_SEP_ba_du<vblex><abl><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-du3-ta
dab5_de3_SEP_<vblex>:dab5-de3
gar_gar_ra_SEP_<vblex>:gar-gar-ra
us2_sa_bi_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><3-sg-nh-poss><sub><nf>:us2-sa-bi-sze3
i3_pa3_SEP_<vblex>:i3-pa3
ti_a_SEP_ti<vblex><nf><pt>:ti-a
ba_hun_ga2_sze3_SEP_ba_hug<vblex><term><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-hun-ga2-sze3
i3_dab5_ke4_ne_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-p>:i3-dab5-ke4-ne
gun3_a_SEP_gunu<vblex><sub><nf>:gun3-a
e3_a_SEP_e<vblex><nf><pt>:e3-a
sanga_ne_SEP_<vblex>:sanga-ne
gu7_a_SEP_<vblex><pt><nf><abs>:gu7-a
diri_bi_SEP_<vblex>:diri-bi
bar_su_ga_SEP_barsuga<vblex><nf><abs>:bar-su-ga
zuh_a_SEP_zuh<vblex><nf><pt>:zuh-a
ba_ra_SEP_bar<vblex><nf><pt>:ba-ra
gur_ra_SEP_gur<vblex><nf><pt>:gur-ra
ba_a_gar_SEP_ba_e_gar<vblex><mid><l2><3-sg-s>:ba-a-gar
mah_ri_SEP_<vblex>:mah-ri
libir_ra_SEP_<vblex><nf><cop-3-sg><dat-h><abs>:libir-ra_
banda3_da_SEP_<vblex><nf>:banda3\{da\}_
na_ba_ab_ti_ti_SEP_<vblex>:na-ba!-ab-ti-ti
mu_na_ak_a_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><ven><l1><3-sg-h><3-sg-p><dat><sub>:mu-na-ak-a
mu_hul_a_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><l1><ven><3-sg-p><sub>:mu-hul-a
ba_dag_SEP_<vblex><mid><3-sg-s>:ba-dag
in_pa3_SEP_i_n_pad<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-p>:in-pa3
du3_SEP_gin<vblex><nf><abs>:du3
zex_SIG7_a_SEP_<vblex><nf><pt>:zex\(SIG7\)-a
gesz_ur3_ra_SEP_geszur<vblex><nf><pt>:gesz-ur3-ra
gibil_SEP_gibil<vblex><nf><abs>:gibil
i3_ze2_e_SEP_<vblex>:i3-ze2-e
ti_la_SEP_til<vblex><term><nf><pt>:ti-la
in_du3_SEP_<vblex><3-sg-h-a><fin><3-sg-p>:in-du3
gu7_a_SEP_<vblex><pt><nf><abs>:gu7-a
uru4_SEP_uru<vblex><nf><pt>:uru4
ib2_gid2_SEP_i_b_gid<vblex><fin><3-sg-nh-l3><3-sg-s>:ib2-gid2
hul2_la_SEP_<vblex><sub><nf>:hul2-la
zal_la_asz_SEP_<vblex><term><nf><pt>:zal-la-asz
zal_la_sze3_SEP_<vblex><term><gen><nf><pt>:zal-la-sze3
ba_usz2_a_SEP_<vblex>:ba-usz2-a
gazx_KUM_SEP_gaz<vblex><nf><pt>:gazx\(KUM\)
